Georgia statutes. TITLE 12 CONSERVATION AND NATURAL RESOURCES
PART 3
P

RESERVATION AND MANAGEMENT OF COASTAL ZONE

12-5-260 through 12-5-267.

Reserved. Repealed by Ga. L. 1979, p. 1302, § 4, effective July 1, 1984.

Editor's notes.

- This part was based on Ga. L. 1978, p. 245; Ga. L. 1979, p. 1302; and Ga. L. 1982, p. 3.

Ga. L. 2013, p. 141,

§

12/HB 79, reserved the designation of this part, effective April 24, 2013.